California, session 20252026, AB1993.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3011.5 is added to the Elections Code, to read:3011.5. (a) (1) Any perforation, hole, window, or other opening in an identification envelope shall be located not less than one-half inch from a fillable field on the ballot, as measured when the ballot is fully inserted into the envelope according to instructions provided to the voter.(2) For purposes of this section, “fillable field” means any voting target or other area of the ballot intended for a voter to mark a vote, write in a candidate, or indicate any other voting preference.(b) The Secretary of State shall adopt regulations to implement this section, including regulations governing standards for identification envelope and ballot alignment, testing procedures, and requirements for certifying compliance with this section.(c) This section applies to any election conducted on or after January 1, 2028.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.